Maine, session 132, LD612.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §20-B is enacted to read:
§20-B. Lottery winnings of benefits recipients
1. Department to enter data-matching agreement with Department of
Administrative and Financial Services. Beginning January 1, 2026, the department shall
enter into a data-matching agreement with the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services to identify households with lottery winnings of $3,000 or more and, to the extent
permissible under federal law, treat this data as verified upon receipt. To the extent the data
is not verified upon receipt, the department shall make referrals for further investigation to
identify households with winnings equal to or greater than the resource limit for elderly or
disabled households as defined in 7 Code of Regulations, Section 273.8(b).
2. Cross-checking data for prize winners. The Department of Administrative and
Financial Services may not distribute lottery winnings to any prize winner without first
cross-checking data provided by the department to determine whether the prize winner is
enrolled in Medicaid or has been enrolled in Medicaid in the previous 12 months or is a
member of a household enrolled in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program or has
been a member of a household enrolled in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
in the previous 12 months. If the Department of Administrative and Financial Services
determines that:
A. A lottery prize winner is not enrolled in Medicaid and has not been enrolled in
Medicaid in the previous 12 months and is not a member of a household enrolled in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and has not been a member of a household
enrolled in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program in the previous 12 months,
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services shall proceed with its
customary procedures for distributing lottery winnings under applicable law; and
B. A lottery prize winner is enrolled in Medicaid or has been enrolled in Medicaid in
the previous 12 months or is a member of a household enrolled in the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program or has been a member of a household enrolled in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program in the previous 12 months, the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services shall:
(1) Notify the department and request an estimate of the State's expenditures in
providing Medicaid benefits and Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits to the prize winner over the previous 5 years by calculating the
department's per capita administrative costs, the duration of the prize winner's
enrollment and specific charges incurred or provider payments made on behalf of
the prize winner;
(2) Deduct from the lottery prize the amount relevant to the prize winner specified
in subparagraph (1);
(3) Remit the deducted amount to the department as reimbursement; and
(4) Pay the prize winner the remaining lottery prize under applicable law, with
notice to the prize winner of the deduction.
3. Exemptions. The provisions of this section do not apply to an individual who is:
Page 1 - 132LR1722(01)

A. Medically certified as physically or mentally unfit for employment; or
B. A parent or caretaker personally providing the care for a dependent child with
serious medical conditions or with a disability, as determined by the department.
4. Benefits programs and lottery materials. The department and the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services shall modify all Medicaid, Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program and lottery materials, including contracts, tickets, brochures,
advertisements and eligibility notices, to provide sufficient notice of the deductions
required under this section.
5. Rules. The department and the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. Rules adopted pursuant
to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined by Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §23, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Out-of-state transactions. The department shall monitor electronic benefits
transfer system data and flag any exclusive out-of-state EBT card transactions by a
recipient over a period of 90 days. Within 30 days of flagging a recipient's transactions, the
department shall contact any recipient who makes solely out-of-state EBT card transactions
over a period of 90 days to determine whether the recipient continues to reside in the State.
If the department determines that the recipient no longer resides in the State or the recipient
does not respond to the department contact under this subsection within 30 days of contact,
the department shall terminate any benefits received by the recipient under this subchapter.
Within 15 days of termination, the department shall provide the information on the recipient
to the United States Department of Agriculture office for the district in which the recipient
resided prior to moving from the State.